North Dakota, session 69, SB2205.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 53-06.1-11.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
53-06.1-11.2. Charitable gaming operating fund - Attorney general - State treasurer -
Allocations - Transfer to the general fund.
1. There is created in the state treasury the charitable gaming operating fund. The fund consists
of all gaming taxes, monetary fines, and interest and penalties collected under this chapter.
2. Excluding moneys in the charitable gaming operating fund appropriated by the legislative
assembly for administrative and operating costs associated with charitable gaming, the
attorney general shall allocate remaining moneys in the charitable gaming operating fund on a
quarterly basis as follows:
a. Ten thousand Seventy - five thousand dollars to the gambling disorder prevention and
treatment fund.
b. Subject to legislative appropriations, five percent of the total moneys deposited in the
charitable gaming operating fund to cities and counties in proportion to the taxes
collected under section 53-06.1-12 from licensed organizations conducting games within
each city, for sites within city limits, or within each county, for sites outside city limits. If a
city or county allocation is less than two hundred dollars, that city or county is not entitled
to receive a payment for the quarter and the undistributed amount must be included in
the total amount to be distributed to other cities and counties for the quarter.
3. On or before June thirtieth of each odd-numbered year, the attorney general shall certify to the
state treasurer the amount of accumulated fundsThe attorney general shall transfer to the
general fund the balance of net proceeds in the charitable gaming operating fund which
exceed the amount appropriated by the legislative assembly for administrative and operating
costs associated with charitable gaming for the subsequent biennium. The state treasurer
shall transfer the certified amount from the charitable gaming operating fund to the general
fund prior to before the end of each biennium.

S. B. NO. 2205 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2205.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 67 Nays 25 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State